Utah statutes.
41-1a-415.   Lost or damaged license plate.
If a license plate is lost or becomes illegible, the owner of the vehicle for
which the license plate was issued shall immediately apply for and obtain a
replacement license plate upon the applicant furnishing information
satisfactory to the division and paying the applicable fee.
